Utah statutes.
70A-8-203.    Staleness as notice of defect or defense.
After an act or event, other than a call that has been revoked, creating a
right to immediate performance of the principal obligation represented by a
certificated security or setting a date on or after which the security is to
be presented or surrendered for redemption or exchange, a purchaser is charged
with notice of any defect in its issue or defense of the issuer, if the act or
event:
(1)  requires the payment of money, the delivery of a certificated security,
the registration of transfer of an uncertificated security, or any of them on
presentation or surrender of the security certificate, the money or security
is available on the date set for payment or exchange, and the purchaser takes
the security more than one year after that date; or
(2)  is not covered by Subsection (1) and the purchaser takes the security
more than two years after the date set for surrender or presentation or the
date on which performance became due.
